Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-618
Violations; cumulative offenses.

Each day any person, firm, corporation, or association violates any of the provisions of sections 12-603 and 12-606 to 12-618, shall be deemed to be a separate and distinct offense.

Laws 1957, c. 18, § 13, p. 149.